Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 3 Local Authorization and Regulations for
Manufacture, Distribution,
and Package Sales

Cross references.

Sale and possession of distilled spirits in dry counties and municipalities generally, T. 3, C. 10.

Editor’s notes.

The functions of calling and supervising special elections to determine whether the issuance of licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits shall be approved, formerly performed by the ordinary (now judge of probate court) of a county or the mayor of a municipality, have been vested in the election superintendent of the county or municipality by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1. For definition of election superintendent, see §§

21-2-2(30)

, 21-3-2(31).

3-4-40.
Requirement as to approval by referendum elections of issuance of licenses generally.

Licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits shall be authorized only in those counties and municipalities in which the issuance of such licenses is approved by a referendum election as provided in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-2301, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, in this Code section, substituted “Licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits shall be” for “Licenses provided for in this article are” near the beginning and substituted “by a referendum election” for “by referendum” near the end.

Law reviews.

For comment on Collins v. Lanier,

201 Ga. 527

,

40 S.E.2d 424

(1946), see 9 Ga. B. J. 325 (1947).

3-4-41.
Petition for referendum; notice of call for referendum.

A referendum election to authorize the issuance of licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits may be initiated upon an ordinance or resolution from the governing authority of any municipality or county or upon a written petition containing the signatures of at least 20 percent of the registered and qualified voters of any municipality or county being filed with the election superintendent of the county or municipality. Such superintendent, upon validation of the ordinance, resolution, or petition, shall be required to call and conduct a referendum election as provided for in Chapter 2 of Title 21, the “Georgia Election Code,” for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters of the municipality or county, as the case may be, the question of whether the issuance of licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits in the political subdivision shall be permitted or prohibited. Such ordinance, resolution, or petition shall not be amended, supplemented, or returned after its presentation to the appropriate authority. Validation shall, for the purposes of petitions authorized under this Code section, be the procedure in which the election superintendent determines whether each signature on the petition is the name of a registered and qualified voter.

For purposes of petitions authorized under this Code section, the required number of signatures of registered voters of a political subdivision shall be computed based on the number of voters qualified to vote at the general election immediately preceding the presentation of the petition. Actual signers of the petition shall be registered and qualified to vote in the referendum election sought by the petition. Upon determining that the petition contains a sufficient number of valid signatures or upon receipt of an ordinance or resolution, the election superintendent shall set the date of the referendum election on a date authorized under Code Section 21-2-540. The referendum may be held as a special referendum election or may be held at the time of holding any other primary or election in such county or municipality.

Notice of the call for the referendum election shall be published by the election superintendent in the official organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. The election superintendent shall also cause the date and purpose of the referendum election to be published in the official organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality, once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of the referendum election.

Following the expiration of two years after any referendum election is held which results in the disapproval of sales as provided in this article, another referendum election on this question shall be held if another ordinance, resolution, or petition, as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, is filed with the appropriate election superintendent.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 5A-2302, 5A-2303, 5A-2309, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 806, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 3; Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485; Ga. L. 2021, p. 450, § 1/SB 145.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, substituted the present provisions of the first sentence of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “Upon a written petition containing the signatures of at least 35 percent of the registered and qualified voters of any municipality or county being filed with the election superintendent of the county or municipality, such superintendent, upon validation of the petition, shall be required to call and hold a referendum election for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters of the municipality or county, as the case may be, the question of whether the manufacture, sale, and distribution of distilled spirits in the political subdivision shall be permitted or prohibited.”; in subsection (c), inserted “election” in the first and second sentences and inserted “referendum” near the end of the second sentence; and inserted “referendum” twice in subsection (d).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 4, 2021, inserted “ordinance, resolution, or” in second and third sentences of subsection (a), and in the middle of subsection (d); in subsection (a), in the first sentence, inserted “an ordinance or resolution from the governing authority of any municipality or county or upon a” and substituted “20 percent” for “35 percent” in the middle; inserted “petitions authorized under” in the last sentence of subsection (a) and near the beginning of subsection (b); in subsection (b), in the third sentence, inserted “or upon receipt of an ordinance or resolution” in the middle, substituted “on a date authorized under Code Section 21-2-540” for “for not less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the call” at the end, and deleted “if such other primary or election is to be held not more than 60 days after the call” following “municipality” at the end of the fourth sentence.

3-4-42.
Form of ballots for referendum election.

The ballot used in any referendum election held pursuant to Code Section 3-4-41 shall have written or printed thereon:

Click to view

Those desiring to vote in favor of the issuance of the licenses shall vote “Yes.” Those desiring to vote against the issuance of the licenses shall vote “No.”

“( ) YES Shall the issuance of licenses for the package sale
( ) NO of distilled spirits be approved?”

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-2306, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, substituted “used in any referendum election held pursuant to Code Section 3-4-41” for “in the special election” in subsection (a).

3-4-43.
Applicability of general election laws.

County elections shall be held according to Chapter 2 of Title 21, the “Georgia Election Code,” and may be held as a special election or at the time of holding any other special or general primary or special or general election in the county. Municipal elections shall be held according to Chapter 2 of Title 21, the “Georgia Election Code,” and may be held as a special election or at the time of holding any other special or general primary or special or general election in the municipality.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-2304, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 806, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 3; Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485, effective May 9, 2017, reenacted this Code section without change.

3-4-44.
Certification of results; payment of expenses.

It shall be the duty of the election superintendent of the county or the municipality, as the case may be, to canvass the returns and declare and certify the results of the election to the Secretary of State. The expense for the election shall be borne by the county or the municipality conducting the election.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-2305, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 806, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 1/HB 485, effective May 9, 2017, reenacted this Code section without change.

3-4-45.
Effect of majority vote in favor of package sales.

If a majority of the votes cast in a referendum election held pursuant to Code Section 3-4-41 are in favor of the issuance of licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits, then the package sale of distilled spirits in the political subdivision shall be permitted in accordance with this chapter at the expiration of 15 days from the date of the certification of the results by the election superintendent; otherwise, the issuance of licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits in the political subdivision shall be prohibited.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-2307, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 28; Ga. L. 1983, p. 806, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “If a majority of the votes cast are in favor of the issuance of the licenses, the manufacture, possession, distribution, and sale by the package of distilled spirits in the political subdivision shall be permitted in accordance with this chapter at the expiration of 15 days from the declaration of the results by the election superintendent.”.

3-4-46.
Procedure for conduct of election for purpose of nullifying previous election result.

In any county or municipality which has at any time held a referendum election in accordance with this article, resulting in the approval of the issuance of licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits, the election superintendent of the county or municipality shall, upon the filing of an ordinance, resolution, or petition as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 3-4-41, proceed to call another referendum election in the same manner as provided in this article for the purpose of nullifying the previous referendum election result.

In the event an election referendum is held pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section and a majority of the votes cast are against the issuance of licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits, then no new licenses for the package sale of distilled spirits within the political subdivision conducting the referendum shall be issued and any existing licensee issued a license for the package sale of distilled spirits shall be prohibited, effective upon the expiration of such license, from engaging in any package sales of distilled spirits within the political subdivision.

No election held pursuant to this Code section shall be called or held within two years after the date of the declaration by the election superintendent of the results of the previous election held for such purpose under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 199, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-2310, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Code 1981, §

3-4-47

; Code 1981, §

3-4-46

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485; Ga. L. 2021, p. 450, § 2/SB 145.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, redesignated former Code Section 3-4-47 as this Code section; substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “In any county or municipality which has at any time held an election in accordance with this article, resulting in the approval of the issuance of licenses for the package sales of distilled spirits, the election superintendent of the county or municipality shall, upon a petition signed by at least 35 percent of the registered qualified voters of the political subdivision concerned, proceed to call another election in the same manner as provided in this article for the purpose of nullifying the previous election result.”; added subsection (b); redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c); and substituted “declaration by the election superintendent of the results” for “declaration of the result” in the middle of subsection (c).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 4, 2021, substituted “an ordinance, resolution, or petition” for “a petition” in the middle of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485, repealed former Code Section 3-4-46, relating to the effect of majority vote against package sales, and enacted the present Code section. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 5A-2307, 5A-2308, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-4-47.
Adoption of resolutions and ordinances; determination of location of retail or businesses licensed by local governing authorities.

A municipality or county may adopt resolutions and ordinances, consistent with this title, as may fall within the police powers of the municipality or county to regulate any business described in this chapter; provided, however, that on and after July 1, 1997, no municipality or county shall authorize the location of a new retail package liquor licensed place of business or the relocation of an existing retail package liquor licensed place of business engaged in the retail package sales of distilled spirits within 500 yards of any other business licensed to sell package liquor at retail, as measured by the most direct route of travel on the ground; provided, however, that this limitation shall not apply to any hotel licensed under this chapter. The restriction provided for in this subsection shall not apply at any location for which a license has been issued prior to July 1, 1997, nor to the renewal of such license. Nor shall the restriction of this subsection apply to any location for which a new license is applied for if the sale of distilled spirits was lawful at such location at any time during the 12 months immediately preceding such application.

The local governing authority of a municipality or county issuing licenses pursuant to this article shall within its jurisdiction have the authority to determine the location of any retail business it licenses, not inconsistent with this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 9; Ga. L. 1973, p. 610, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2312, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 29; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1588, § 1; Code 1981, §

3-4-49

; Code 1981, §

3-4-47

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, redesignated former Code Section 3-4-49 as this Code section; substituted “resolutions and ordinances” for “all reasonable rules and regulations” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (a); and substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “All municipal and county authorities issuing licenses shall within their respective jurisdictions have authority to determine the location of any distillery, wholesale business, or retail business licensed by them, not inconsistent with this title.”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485, effective May 9, 2017, redesignated former Code Section 3-4-47 as present Code Section 3-4-46.

3-4-48.
Maximum annual license fees for municipal or county licenses.

The annual license fee to be charged by a municipality or county pursuant to this article shall not be more than $5,000.00 for each license.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 9; Ga. L. 1965, p. 451, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2313, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Code 1981, §

3-4-50

; Code 1981, §

3-4-48

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, redesignated former Code Section 3-4-50 as this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485, repealed former Code Section 3-4-48, relating to the effective date of nullification of previous election result, and enacted the present Code section. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1, and was repealed effective May 9, 2017.

3-4-49.
Municipalities in wet counties.

Any municipality which lies wholly or partially within a county which has approved the manufacture, distribution, or package sale of distilled spirits in a county-wide referendum election as provided in this article and which, on January 1, 1985, was issuing licenses permitting the manufacture, distribution, or package sale of distilled spirits shall be authorized to exercise the powers and shall be subject to the provisions contained in this title relating to the manufacture, distribution, or package sale of distilled spirits.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-4-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1083, § 1; Code 1981, §

3-4-51

; Code 1981, §

3-4-49

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, redesignated former Code Section 3-4-51 as this Code section; and in this Code section, substituted “distribution, or package sale” for “sale, or distribution” throughout, and inserted “election” near the middle.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

3-4-50.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485, effective May 9, 2017, redesignated former Code Section 3-4-50 as present Code Section 3-4-48.

3-4-51.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 2/HB 485, effective May 9, 2017, redesignated former Code Section 3-4-51 as present Code Section 3-4-49.